Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3984
Yard or loafing area requirements.

The yard or loafing area of a facility producing milk for manufacturing purposes shall be of ample size to prevent overcrowding, shall be drained to prevent forming of water pools, and shall be kept clean. Manure piles shall not be accessible to the dairy animals. Swine shall not be allowed in the yard or loafing area.

Laws 1969, c. 5, § 10, p. 75;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 81-263.96;

Laws 1980, LB 632, § 20;

Laws 1993, LB 268, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1997), § 2-3920;

Laws 2007, LB111, § 20.